Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5433.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2. (1) As used in this act:
(a) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, joint
venture, association, social club, fraternal organization,
municipal or private corporation whether or not organized for
profit, company, limited liability company, estate, trust,
receiver, trustee, syndicate, the United States, this state, a
county, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and
includes the plural as well as the singular number, unless the
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


intention to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the
context.
(b) "Use" means the exercise of a right or power over tangible
personal property incident to the ownership of that property
including transfer of the property in a transaction where
possession is given. Converting tangible personal property acquired
for a use exempt from the tax levied under this act to a use not
exempt from the tax levied under this act is a taxable use.
(c) "Storage" means a keeping or retention of property in this
state for any purpose after the property loses its interstate
character.
(d) "Seller" means the person from whom a purchase is made and
includes every person selling tangible personal property or
services for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. If,
in the opinion of the department, it is necessary for the efficient
administration of this act to regard a salesperson, representative,
peddler, or canvasser as the agent of a dealer, distributor,
supervisor, or employer under whom the person operates or from whom
the person obtains tangible personal property or services sold by
the person for storage, use, or other consumption in this state,
irrespective of whether or not the person is making the sales on
the person's own behalf or on behalf of the dealer, distributor,
supervisor, or employer, the department may so consider the person,
and may consider the dealer, distributor, supervisor, or employer
as the seller for the purpose of this act.
(e) "Purchase" means to acquire for a consideration, whether
the acquisition is effected by a transfer of title, of possession,
or of both, or a license to use or consume; whether the transfer is
absolute or conditional, and by whatever means the transfer is
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


effected; and whether consideration is a price or rental in money,
or by way of exchange or barter. Purchase includes converting
tangible personal property acquired for a use exempt from the tax
levied under this act to a use not exempt from the tax levied under
this act.
(f) "Purchase price" or "price" means the total amount of
consideration paid by the consumer to the seller, including cash,
credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal
property or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise, and applies to the measure
subject to use tax. Purchase price includes the following
subparagraphs (i) to (vii) and excludes subparagraphs (viii) to (xv):
(i) Seller's cost of the property sold.
(ii) Cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest,
losses, costs of transportation to the seller, taxes imposed on the
seller other than taxes imposed by this act, and any other expense
of the seller.
(iii) Charges by the seller for any services necessary to
complete the sale, other than the following:
(A) An amount received or billed by the taxpayer for
remittance to the employee as a gratuity or tip, if the gratuity or
tip is separately identified and itemized on the guest check or
billed to the customer.
(B) Labor or service charges involved in maintenance and
repair work on tangible personal property of others if separately
itemized.
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xv),
delivery charges. A seller is not liable under this act for
delivery charges allocated to the delivery of exempt property.
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


(v) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xv),
installation charges.
(vi) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (xi), (xii),
and (xiv), credit for any trade-in.
(vii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (x),
consideration received by the seller from third parties if all of
the following conditions are met:
(A) The seller actually receives consideration from a party
other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly related
to a price reduction or discount on the sale.
(B) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction
or discount through to the purchaser.
(C) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale
is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of
the item to the purchaser.
(D) One of the following criteria is met:
(I) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding
that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented.
(II) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller
as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price
reduction or discount. A preferred customer card that is available
to any patron does not constitute membership in a group or
organization.
(III) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third
party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation
presented by the purchaser.
(viii) Interest, financing, or carrying charges from credit
extended on the sale of personal property or services, if the
amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser.
(ix) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that
are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar
document given to the purchaser.
(x) Beginning January 1, 2000, employee discounts that are
reimbursed by a third party on sales of motor vehicles.
(xi) Beginning November 15, 2013, credit for the agreed-upon
value of a titled watercraft used as part payment of the purchase
price of a new titled watercraft or used titled watercraft
purchased from a watercraft dealer if the agreed-upon value is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser. This subparagraph does not apply to leases
or rentals.
(xii) Beginning December 15, 2013, credit for the agreed-upon
value of a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle used as part
payment of the purchase price of a new motor vehicle or used motor
vehicle or recreational vehicle purchased from a dealer if the
agreed-upon value is separately stated on the invoice, bill of
sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. This subparagraph
does not apply to leases or rentals. Except as otherwise provided
under subparagraph (xiv), for purposes of this subparagraph, the
agreed-upon value of a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle used
as part payment is limited as follows:
(A) Beginning December 15, 2013, subject to sub-subparagraphs
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


(B) and (C), the lesser of the following:
(I) $2,000.00.
(II) The agreed-upon value of the motor vehicle or
recreational vehicle used as part payment.
(B) Beginning January 1, 2015 and each January 1 thereafter
through December 31, 2018, the amount under sub-subparagraph (A)(I)
is increased by an additional $500.00 each year.
(C) Beginning January 1, 2019, subject to sub-subparagraphs
(D) and (E), the lesser of the following:
(I) $5,000.00.
(II) The agreed-upon value of the motor vehicle used as part
payment.
(D) Beginning January 1, 2020 and each January 1 thereafter,
the amount under sub-subparagraph (C)(I) is increased by an
additional $1,000.00 each year.
(E) Beginning on January 1, in the year in which the amount
under sub-subparagraph (C)(I) exceeds $14,000.00 and each January 1
thereafter, there is no limitation on the agreed-upon value of the
motor vehicle used as part payment.
(xiii) Beginning January 1, 2017, credit for the core charge
attributable to a recycling fee, deposit, or disposal fee for a
motor vehicle or recreational vehicle part or battery if the
recycling fee, deposit, or disposal fee is separately stated on the
invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser.
(xiv) Beginning January 1, 2018, credit for the agreed-upon
value of a recreational vehicle used as part payment of the
purchase price of a recreational vehicle purchased from a dealer if
the agreed-upon value is separately stated on the invoice, bill of
sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. This subparagraph
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


does not apply to leases or rentals.
(xv) Delivery or installation charges if such charges are
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
provided to the purchaser, and the taxpayer maintains its books and
records to show separately the transactions used to determine the
tax levied by this act. This subdivision does not apply to delivery
or installation charges involving or relating to the sale of
electricity, natural gas, or artificial gas by a utility.
(g) "Consumer" means the person who has purchased tangible
personal property or services for storage, use, or other
consumption in this state and includes, but is not limited to, 1 or
more of the following:
(i) A person acquiring tangible personal property if engaged in
the business of constructing, altering, repairing, or improving the
real estate of others.
(ii) A person who has converted tangible personal property or
services acquired for storage, use, or consumption in this state
that is exempt from the tax levied under this act to storage, use,
or consumption in this state that is not exempt from the tax levied
under this act.
(h) "Business" means all activities engaged in by a person or
caused to be engaged in by a person with the object of gain,
benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect.
(i) "Department" means the department of treasury.
(j) "Tax" includes all taxes, interest, or penalties levied
under this act.
(k) "Tangible personal property" means personal property that
can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched or that is in any
other manner perceptible to the senses and includes electricity,
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software.
(l) "Textiles" means goods that are made of or incorporate
woven or nonwoven fabric, including, but not limited to, clothing,
shoes, hats, gloves, handkerchiefs, curtains, towels, sheets,
pillows, pillowcases, tablecloths, napkins, aprons, linens, floor
mops, floor mats, and thread. Textiles also include materials used
to repair or construct textiles, or other goods used in the rental,
sale, or cleaning of textiles.
(m) "Interstate motor carrier" means a person who operates or
causes to be operated a qualified commercial motor vehicle on a
public road or highway in this state and at least 1 other state or
Canadian province.
(n) "Qualified commercial motor vehicle" means that term as
defined in section 1(l), (m), and (n) 1 of the motor carrier fuel
tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211.
(o) "Diesel fuel" means that term as defined in section 2(q)
of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1002.
(p) "Sale" means a transaction by which tangible personal
property or services are purchased or rented for storage, use, or
other consumption in this state.
(q) "Convert" means putting a service or tangible personal
property acquired for a use exempt from the tax levied under this
act at the time of acquisition to a use that is not exempt from the
tax levied under this act, whether the use is in whole or in part,
or permanent or not permanent. A motor vehicle purchased for resale
by a new vehicle dealer licensed under section 248(8)(a) of the
Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.248, and not registered
in the name of the dealer is not considered to be converted before
sale or lease by that dealer.
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


(r) "New motor vehicle" means that term as defined in section
33a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.33a.
(s) "Recreational vehicle" means that term as defined in
section 49a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.49a.
(t) "Dealer" means that term as defined in section 11 of the
Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.11.
(u) "Watercraft dealer" means a dealer as that term is defined
in section 80102 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80102.
(v) "Utility" means either of the following:
(i) A person regulated by the Michigan public service
commission as a utility.
(ii) A person that operates equipment or facilities for
producing, generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing
electricity within this state for the public for compensation,
regardless of the person's owner, ownership structure, or
regulation by the Michigan public service commission.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, the
following applies only to delivery and installation charges
described in subsection (1)(f)(iv) or (v), except that this
subsection does not apply to delivery and installation charges
involving or relating to the sale of electricity, natural gas, or
artificial gas by a utility:
(a) Not later than July 25, 2023, the department shall cancel
all outstanding balances related to such delivery and installation
charges on notices of intent to assess that were issued under
section 21 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.21, for the tax levied under
this act and that were issued before April 26, 2023.
(b) Not later than July 25, 2023, the department shall cancel
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


all outstanding balances related to such delivery and installation
charges on final assessments that were issued under section 22 of
1941 PA 122, MCL 205.22, for the tax levied under this act, and
that were issued before April 26, 2023.
(c) Beginning April 26, 2023, the department shall not issue
any new assessments for the tax levied under this act on such
delivery and installation charges for any tax period before April
26, 2023, that is open under the statute of limitations provided in
section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a.
Sec. 4a. The following are exempt from the tax under this act:
(a) Rental receipts if the tangible personal property rented
or leased was previously subject to 1 of the following when
purchased by the lessor:
(i) This act.
(ii) The general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to
205.78.
(b) Rental receipts if the tangible personal property rented
or leased was previously taxed under a sales or use tax act of
another state or a political subdivision of another state levied at
a rate of 6% or more.
(c) Specific charges for technical support or for adapting or
modifying prewritten computer software programs to a purchaser's
needs or equipment if those charges are separately stated and
identified.
(d) The sale of computer software originally designed for the
exclusive use and special needs of the purchaser.
(e) The sale of a commercial advertising element if the
commercial advertising element is used to create or develop a
print, radio, television, or other advertisement, the commercial
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7


advertising element is discarded or returned to the provider after
the advertising message is completed, and the commercial
advertising element is custom developed by the provider for the
purchaser. As used in this subdivision, "commercial advertising
element" means a negative or positive photographic image, an
audiotape or videotape master, a layout, a manuscript, writing of
copy, a design, artwork, an illustration, retouching, and
mechanical or keyline instructions. This exemption does not include
black and white or full color process separation elements, an
audiotape reproduction, or a videotape reproduction.
(f) The sale of oxygen for human use dispensed pursuant to a
prescription.
(g) The sale of insulin for human use.
(h) A meal provided free of charge or at a reduced rate to an
employee during work hours by a food service establishment licensed
by the department of agriculture.
(i) The sale of diesel fuel to a person who is an interstate
motor carrier for use in a qualified commercial motor vehicle.
(j) The use or consumption of electric fuel to propel a motor
vehicle if that use or consumption is taxed under either the motor
carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211 to 207.234, or the
motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1001 to 207.1170. As used
in this subdivision, "electric fuel" means that term as defined in
section 157 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1157.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are
enacted into law:
(a) House Bill No. 5434.
(b) House Bill No. 5435.
Final Page
JJR H00427'25 a (H-1) 5gxwk7